test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-a_gt-norm.yaml
    Noun - vaarâ:
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaarân
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaarâst
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Com: vaaráin
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Abe: varâttáá
    vaarâ+N+Ess: vaarrân
    vaarâ+N+Par: vaarrâd
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaarah
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Gen: vaarâi 
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Gen: varâi
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaarâid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaaráid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaarâin
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Com: varâiguin
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Abe: varâittáá
    
    Noun - laahâ:
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laahâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: lavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: laavâi 
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: lavâi
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: lavâiguin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavâittáá
    
    Noun - viehâ:
    viehâ+N+Sg+Nom: viehâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Gen: vievâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Acc: vievâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Ill: viehân
    viehâ+N+Sg+Loc: vievâst
    viehâ+N+Sg+Com: vievváin
    viehâ+N+Sg+Abe: vievâttáá
    viehâ+N+Ess: viehân
    viehâ+N+Par: viehâd
    viehâ+N+Pl+Nom: vievah
    viehâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vievâi,vievâi]
    viehâ+N+Pl+Acc: vievâid
    viehâ+N+Pl+Ill: vievváid 
    viehâ+N+Pl+Loc: vievâin
    viehâ+N+Pl+Com: vievâiguin
    viehâ+N+Pl+Abe: vievâittáá
    
    Noun - mielgâ:
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Ill: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâst
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Com: mielgáin
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâttáá
    mielgâ+N+Ess: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Par: mielgâd
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Nom: mielgah
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [mielgâi, mielgâi]
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Ill: mielgáid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Com: mielgâiguin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâittáá

Noun - kuorgâ:
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuorgâst
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Com: kuorgáin
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuorgâttáá
    kuorgâ+N+Ess: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Par: kuorgâd
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuorgah
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuorgâi, kuorgâi]
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuorgâid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuorgáid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuorgâin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Com: kuorgâiguin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuorgâittáá
    
    Noun - vuovdâ:
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuovdâst
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Com: vuovdáin
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuovdâttáá
    vuovdâ+N+Ess: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Par: vuovdâd
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuovdah
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vuovdâi, vuovdâi]
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuovdâid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuovdáid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuovdâin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Com: vuovdâiguin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuovdâittáá
    
    Noun - čuoškâ:
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Nom: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Gen: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Acc: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Ill: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Loc: čuoškâst
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Com: čuoškáin
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Abe: čuoškâttáá
    čuoškâ+N+Ess: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Par: čuoškâd
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Nom: čuoškah
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čuoškâi, čuoškâi]
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Acc: čuoškâid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Ill: čuoškáid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Loc: čuoškâin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Com: čuoškâiguin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Abe: čuoškâittáá
    
    Noun - lievlâ:
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Nom: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Gen: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Acc: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Ill: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Loc: lievlâst
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Com: lievláin
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Abe: lievlâttáá
    lievlâ+N+Ess: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Par: lievlâd
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Nom: lievlah
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Gen: [lievlâi, lievlâi]
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Acc: lievlâid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Ill: lievláid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Loc: lievlâin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Com: lievlâiguin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Abe: lievlâittáá
    
    Noun - lahcâ:
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Nom: lahcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahcân
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavcâst
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Com: lavcáin
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavčâttáá
    lahcâ+N+Ess: lahcân
    lahcâ+N+Par: lahcâd
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavcah
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavcâi, lavcâi]
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavcâid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavcáid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavcâin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Com: lavcâiguin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavcâittáá
    
    Noun - jotkâ:
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Nom: jotkâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Gen: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Acc: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Ill: jootkân
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Loc: joođhâst
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Com: jođháin
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Abe: jođhâttáá
    jotkâ+N+Ess: jotkân
    jotkâ+N+Par: jotkâd
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Nom: joođhah
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [joođhâi, jođhâi]
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Acc: joođhâid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Ill: jođháid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Loc: joođhâin
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Com: jođhâiguin
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Abe: jođhâittáá
    
    Noun - robdâ:
    robdâ+N+Sg+Nom: robdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Gen: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Acc: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Ill: roobdân
    robdâ+N+Sg+Loc: roobdâst
    robdâ+N+Sg+Com: robdáin
    robdâ+N+Sg+Abe: robdâttáá
    robdâ+N+Ess: robdân
    robdâ+N+Par: robdâd
    robdâ+N+Pl+Nom: roobdah
    robdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roobdâi, robdâi]
    robdâ+N+Pl+Acc: roobdâid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Ill: robdáid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Loc: roobdâin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Com: robdâiguin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Abe: robdâittáá
    
      Noun - pakkâ:
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Nom: pakkâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Gen: paahâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Acc: paahâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Ill: paakân
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Loc: paahâst
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Com: pahháin
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Abe: pahâttáá
    pakkâ+N+Ess: pakkân
    pakkâ+N+Par: pakkâd
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Nom: paahah
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paahâi, pahâi]
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Acc: paahâid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Ill: pahháid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Loc: paahâin
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Com: pahâiguin
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Abe: pahâittáá
    
  Noun - valssâ:
    valssâ+N+Sg+Nom: valssâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaalsân
    valssâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaalsâst
    valssâ+N+Sg+Com: vaalsáin
    valssâ+N+Sg+Abe: valˊsâttáá
    valssâ+N+Ess: valssân
    valssâ+N+Par: valssâd
    valssâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaalsah
    valssâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaalsâi, vaalˊsâi]
    valssâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaalsâid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaalsáid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaalsâin
    valssâ+N+Pl+Com: valˊsâiguin
    valssâ+N+Pl+Abe: valˊsâittáá
    
 Noun - loppâ:
    loppâ+N+Sg+Nom: loppâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Gen: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Acc: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Ill: loopân
    loppâ+N+Sg+Loc: loopâst
    loppâ+N+Sg+Com: loppáin
    loppâ+N+Sg+Abe: lopâttáá
    loppâ+N+Ess: loppân
    loppâ+N+Par: loppâd
    loppâ+N+Pl+Nom: loopah
    loppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [loopâi, lopâi]
    loppâ+N+Pl+Acc: loopâid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Ill: loppáid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Loc: loopâin
    loppâ+N+Pl+Com: lopâiguin
    loppâ+N+Pl+Abe: lopâittáá

  Noun - pennâ:
    pennâ+N+Sg+Nom: pennâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Gen: peenâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Acc: peenâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Ill: peenân
    pennâ+N+Sg+Loc: peenâst
    pennâ+N+Sg+Com: pennáin
    pennâ+N+Sg+Abe: penâttáá
    pennâ+N+Ess: pennân
    pennâ+N+Par: pennâd
    pennâ+N+Pl+Nom: pennah
    pennâ+N+Pl+Gen: [peenâi, penâi]
    pennâ+N+Pl+Acc: peenâid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Ill: pennáid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Loc: peenâin
    pennâ+N+Pl+Com: penâiguin
    pennâ+N+Pl+Abe: penâittáá   
    
  Noun - sekkâ:
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Nom: sekkâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Gen: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Acc: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Ill: seekân
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Loc: seehâst
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Com: sehháin
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Abe: sehâttáá
    sekkâ+N+Ess: sekkân
    sekkâ+N+Par: sekkâd
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Nom: seehah
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [seehâi, sehâi]
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Acc: seehâid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Ill: sehháid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Loc: seehâin
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Com: sehâiguin
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Abe: sehâittáá
    
    
 Noun - cuoppâ:
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuoppâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuopân
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuopâst
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Com: cuoppáin
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuoppâttáá
    cuoppâ+N+Ess: cuoppân
    cuoppâ+N+Par: cuoppâd
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuopah
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [cuopâi, cuopâi]
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuopâid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuoppáid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuopâin
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Com: cuopâiguin
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuopâittáá
    
    
  Noun - ruossâ:
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruossâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruosân
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruosâst
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Com: ruossáin
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruossâttáá
    ruossâ+N+Ess: ruossân
    ruossâ+N+Par: ruossâd
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruosah
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruosâi, ruosâi]
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruosâid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruossáid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruosâin
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Com: ruosâiguin
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruosâittáá
    
  Noun - cuozzâ:
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuozzâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuozân
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuozâst
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Com: cuozzáin
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuozzâttáá
    cuozzâ+N+Ess: cuozzân
    cuozzâ+N+Par: cuozzâd
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuozah
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Gen: [cuozâi, cuozâi]
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuozâid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuozzáid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuozâin
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Com: cuozâiguin
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuozâittáá
    
